DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-231
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6XD-03

DTC

C1224 /44 NE Signal Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The skid control ECU receives engine revolution speed signals (NE signals) from the engine and ECT ECU.

DTC No.

DTC Detecting Condition

Trouble Area

C1224 /44

When any of the following 1. through 2. is detected:
1.

At vehicle speed of 30 km/h (19 mph) or more, and

when data received from the engine and ECT ECU is
normal condition, and open or short circuit for engine
revolution signal circuit continues for 10 sec. or more.

circuit in engine revolution signal circuit is detected,

main throttle opening degree is 0 and IDL switch is OFF

continue for 0.24 sec. or more.

in
*NEO circuit
¢ Engine and ECT ECU

. While TRC is operating, the conditions that open or short |  Skid control ECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkforopenandshortcircuitin harness and connector between terminal

IN-38).

NEO of skid control ECU and terminal NEO of engine and ECT ECU (See page

NG Repair or replace harness and connector.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)




DI-232 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
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2 [ Check voltage between terminal NEO of skid control ECU and body ground.

ON PREPARATION:
@ NEO Remove skid control ECU with connectors still connected.
CHECK:

‘ Lugl | (@  Turn the ignition switch ON.

Yz (b) Measure voltage between terminal NEO of skid control
o ECU and body ground for the engine conditions below.

OK:
Engine condition Voltage
F02807 OFF (IG ON) 10 - 14Vorbelow1V
ON (Idling) 10 — 14V <> below 1V (Pulse)
(Reference)
10 - 14V —
Below 1V
F03007
NG Check and replace skid control ECU or engine
and ECT ECU.

@

If the same codes is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection.
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